   Company Profile | Charter Communications Newsroom            Company ProfileLearn about Charter and its business units. About Charter Company History Quality Products and Services Connecting with Communities 26,000,000Charter customers 41States Charter serves 91,000Charter employeesAbout CharterCharter Communications (NASDAQ: CHTR) is America’s fastest growing TV, internet and voice company. We’re committed to integrating the highest quality service with superior entertainment and communications products. Charter is at the intersection of technology and entertainment, facilitating essential communications that connect more than 26 million residential and business customers in 41 states. Our commitment to serving customers and exceeding their expectations is the bedrock of Charter’s business strategy and it’s the philosophy that guides our 91,000 employees.Company HistoryCharter is currently the second largest cable provider in the United States. The company has achieved growth through innovation and acquisitions of cable properties, most recently completing transactions with Time Warner Cable and Bright House Networks.The Charter name comes from the founding of Charter Communications, Inc. in 1993 and, while the company has grown and evolved on many levels over the past two decades, our roots take us all the way back to the early days of cable. What started as mom-and-pop businesses with cable strung from hilltops to homes in the late 1940s has evolved into the dynamic cable industry we know today. 1948First cable systems are founded  1951The National Cable & Telecommunications Association (NCTA), the principal trade association for the U.S. cable industry, is founded  1964Newhouse begins operating cable systems with the purchase of its first system in Alabama, branding it NewChannels  1973Warner Communications forms Warner Cable  1979Newhouse forms second cable company, MetroVision, in partnership with former Cox executives  1981Newhouse adds Vision Cable to cable assets  1989Time Warner Inc. forms through merger of Warner Communications and Time Inc.  1992Warner Cable and American Television & Communications (ATC) combine to form Time Warner Cable  1993Charter Communications, Inc. is founded and acquisitions of cable systems across the country begin  1994Time Warner Entertainment and Advance/Newhouse form cable partnership  1998Microsoft co-founder Paul Allen buys a controlling interest in Charter  1999Charter begins trading publicly on the NASDAQ stock exchange under symbol CHTR  2001Charter earns spot on Fortune 500  2003Advance/Newhouse begins operating Bright House Networks with approximately 2.2 million customers in Alabama, California, Florida, Indiana and Michigan  2007Time Warner Cable begins trading publicly on the NYSE  2009Charter completes financial restructuring under chapter 11, emerging as a stronger company under new equity ownershipTime Warner Cable separates from Time Warner Inc.  2012Thomas M. Rutledge is appointed President & CEO of Charter  2013Charter gains Liberty Media as an investor and announces Spectrum brand  2016Charter, Time Warner Cable and Bright House Networks combine to form larger, stronger Charter Quality Products and ServicesSuperior, reliable, consistent services that deliver value – that’s our focus. Over the years, Charter has invested billions of dollars in infrastructure improvements, unleashing the power of an advanced, two-way, fully interactive fiber network. By moving to this all-digital network, today’s Charter customers enjoy the most HD TV channels, more On Demand choices and the fastest internet speeds.Charter delivers a wide range of TV, internet and voice services to residential and business customers through the Spectrum brand.Spectrum TV offers more HD than any other provider, DVR service and instant access to thousands of On Demand choices, many in HD. Watch live TV anywhere in the home or download movies and shows to go on mobile devices with the Spectrum TV App or take TV Everywhere with over 60 channel apps to watch on the go.Spectrum Internet provides the fastest Internet speeds available starting at 60 Mbps (100 Mbps in some markets). With Spectrum Internet, customers can simultaneously stream videos, download music and more without sacrificing performance. Charter provides free modems and the fastest, most powerful in-home WiFi to do more on more devices. And because Charter doesn’t limit internet with data caps or extra fees, customers always have the freedom of unlimited internet service.Spectrum Voice is a fully featured, reliable service with unlimited local and long-distance calling plans that include voicemail and other popular calling features like call waiting and call forwarding, plus free 411. Serving approximately 10 million voice customers, Charter is among the largest providers of residential phone service in the nation.Spectrum Business helps small businesses achieve better results by delivering reliable Internet, Ethernet, voice and enhancement solutions. Spectrum Business customers enjoy a wide range of products – from high-quality broadband services to phone systems and top-tier digital TV and music – all flexible to meet the demands of growing businesses.Spectrum Enterprise builds business-to-business solutions with a people-to-people focus, providing the bandwidth and support customers need to accelerate business. Charter’s largest customers enjoy enterprise-grade voice, video, data, network, cloud and managed services via a flexible and secure fiber-based network.Spectrum Community Solutions provide customized, managed WiFi, TV and voice services to residential apartments and other multi-dwelling units via fiber connections. Spectrum Fiber WiFi delivers the fastest, most powerful connection with more bandwidth and no data caps.Spectrum Reach, the advertising sales division of Charter, offers traditional commercial advertising and new interactive solutions for the modern media landscape. Spectrum Reach offers promotional solutions through national cable networks, internet advertising, mobile marketing and events supported by marketing, research and creative services teams.Connecting with CommunitiesCharter is committed to improving communities and impacting lives where our customers and employees live, work and play.Through our national philanthropic initiative, Spectrum Housing Assist, Charter partners with nonprofit organizations to make homes safer and healthier. We engage employees and community volunteers in order to facilitate these crucial home repairs, with the goal of improving 25,000 homes by the year 2020.To learn more about Spectrum Housing Assist and our other philanthropic efforts, please visit responsibility.spectrum.com. © 2017 Charter CommunicationsTerms of ServicePrivacyPolicyInvestor RelationsContacts 



Regulatory - Federal and State Tariffs





































Home
Time Warner Cable Terms & Conditions


Regulatory & Carrier Relations











 



Regulatory


State and Federal Tariffs
Carrier Relations




This page provides access to tariffs filed by various Time Warner Cable affiliates with the Federal Communications Commission (“FCC”) and state regulatory authorities, as indicated. Tariffs describe the rates, terms and conditions that apply to certain regulated telecommunications services offered by Time Warner Cable affiliates.

Alabama
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Alabama), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
AL Tariff No 2 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS AL FCC Tariff No1
AL TWCB IXC Tariff
Arizona
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Arizona), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCB Arizona IXC Tariff 
TWCIS AZ PUC Intrastate Tariff No. 1 
TWCIS AZ FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
California
Time Warner Cable Information Services (California), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS CA FCC PUC No. 5-T 
TWCIS CA Tariff No. 1 Access Services
TWCIS CA PUC Tariff - Competitive Local Carrier Services
Colorado
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Colorado), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS CO PUC Tariff No 1 Local Interconnection Service
TWCIS CO PUC Tariff No 2 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS CO FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Florida
Time Warner Cable Business LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
FL TRF LOCAL 2014 0611 CUR01
Hawaii
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Hawaii), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS HI PUC Tariff No. 2 - Local and Interexchange Services
TWCIS HI PUC Tariff No. 3 Intrastate Access Services
HI Tariff PUC 1 IXC Telecom
TWCIS HI FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Idaho
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Idaho), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
ID Tariff No 1 Intrastat Access Service
TWCIS ID FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
ID Tariff IXC Telecom Price List
Illinois
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Illinois), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
Illinois C.C. Tariff No. 1 - Local and Interexchange Service
TWCIS IL CC Tariff No2 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS IL FCC Tariff No1
IL CC Tariff No1 IXC Telecom
Indiana
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Indiana), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
IN Tariff No 1 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS IN Tariff Access Services
Kansas
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Kansas), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services Tariff
TWCIS KS FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Kentucky
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Kentucky), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS KY Local and Interexchange Services
TWCIS KY PSC Tariff No. 2
TWCIS KY FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Maine
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Maine), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
ME Tariff No 2 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS ME PUC Tariff No1 Local Interconnection Service
TWCIS ME Tariff Access Services
Massachusetts
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Massachusetts), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS MA M.D.T.E. No. 1 Local and Interexchange Service Tariff
TWCIS MA M.D.T.C. No. 2 Intrastate Access Service Tariff
TWCIS MA FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Service
Michigan
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Michigan), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
M.P.S.C. No. 1 Local Exchange Service
M.P.S.C. No. 2 Interexchange Service
M.P.S.C. No. 3 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS MI FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Service
Missouri
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Missouri), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS MO PSC No. 5 Competitive Access Services
TWCIS MO PSC Tariff No4 Local and Interexchange Services
TWCIS MO FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Nebraska
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Nebraska), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
P.S.C. Tariff No. 1 Competitive Local and Interexchange Service
TWCIS NE PSC Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS NE FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
New Hampshire
Time Warner Cable Information Services (New Hampshire), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NH PUC Rate Schedule No. 2
TWCIS NH PUC Rate Schedule No3
TWCIS NH Tariff Access Services 
New Jersey
Time Warner Cable Information Services (New Jersey), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NJ Tariff No. 1 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS NJ Tariff No. 2 Local Exchange Service
TWCIS NJ FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
New Mexico
Time Warner Cable Information Services (New Mexico), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NM Tariff No. 1 Interexchange Service
TWCIS NM Tariff No. 2 Local Service
TWCIS NM PRC Tariff No. 3 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS NM FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Service
NM CC Tariff No1 IXC Telecom
New York
Time Warner Cable Information Services (New York), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NY P.S.C. No. 2 Telephone Access Services 
TWCIS NY P.S.C. No. 3 Local and Interexchange Telecommunications
TWCIS NY FCC Tariff Access Service
NY PSC Tariff No1 IXC Telecom
North Carolina
Time Warner Cable Information Services (North Carolina), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NC Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS NC Tariff Access Services
Ohio
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Ohio), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
OH Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services Tariff
TWCIS OH Tariff Access Services
Pennsylvania
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Pennsylvania), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
PA P.U.C. Tariff No. 1 Competitive Local Exchange Carrier
TWCIS PA FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
PAPUC Tariff No2 Switched Access Tariff
PA PUC Tariff No1 CAP
South Carolina
Time Warner Cable Information Services (South Carolina), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS SC Tariff No. 1 Local and Interexchange
TWCIS SC Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS SC FCC Tariff No. 1
SC Tariff No1 IXC Telecom
Tennessee
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Tenessee), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable.
Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services Tariff
TN Tariff Packaged Local and Interexchange Service
TWCIS TN Tariff Access Services
Texas
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Texas), LLC Texas d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS TX PUC Tariff No. 1 Local & Interexchange Service
TWCIS TX PUC Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS TX FCC Tariff No. 2 Access Service
Virginia
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Virginia), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS FCC Tariff Access Services
TWCB_VA_Price_List
TWCIS VA FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Service
Washington
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Washington), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable.
TWCIS WA Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS WA FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
West Virginia
Time Warner Cable Information Services (West Virginia), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
W.V.P.S.C. No. 1 Competitive Local and Interexchange Service
TWCIS WV FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
TWCIS WV Tariff No2 Intrastate Access Services
WV PSC Interexchange Service No1
Wisconsin
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Wisconsin), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS Wisconsin Tariff No. 1 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS WI FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services







This document will assist Trading Partners of Time Warner Cable (TWC) in gaining access to the TWC GUI and placing Local Service Requests (LSRs) for porting numbers.






1. Purpose and Audience 


This user guide is directed to those personnel responsible for submitting industry requests to Time Warner Cable (TWC), including order entry and management for number portability.  This document provides guidelines for accessing the TWC graphical user interface (GUI), placing port orders and requirements for one day simple ports, and placing standard or complex port orders.





2. Getting Started


To access the TWC GUI and place a Local Service Request (LSR) for porting out numbers, a carrier must have a user ID and password. Each Trading Partner must complete and submit a Trading Partner Summary and Porting Information forms to: 
Carrier@twcable.com
Once the user ID and password are assigned, the carrier may access the TWC GUI at https://twc-port.neustar.com/gateway/.





3. Ordering Guidelines


The following are guidelines for completing and submitting LSRs to TWC for the purpose of porting a TN away from TWC. 

The end user name and address provided on the End User Form must exactly match the service address and location section of the Customer Service Inquiry response for all TWC commercial accounts.
The operating company number (OCN)/state should be selected based off the numbering plan area (NPA) of the telephone number being requested.  TWC will only port telephone numbers that are used for two-way communication.
Telephone numbers not converted by the new number service provider (NNSP) do not need to be addressed on the LSR. TWC will not disconnect unwanted TNs identified on a LSR port request. The customer will need to contact TWC directly (identified on the bill) to arrange for disconnection of any unwanted TNs.
Desired due dates over 30 calendar days from the submitted date will not be accepted.
Rejected LSRs will be cancelled after five business days. LSR charges may apply pursuant to the terms of the applicable industry agreement.
If you feel your LSR has been improperly rejected, send an e-mail to twc.serviceordersupport@twcable.com
LSRs containing more than 20 telephone numbers, unless otherwise stated in your industry agreement, will be handled as a project. Both parties will negotiate implementation details, including due date/time. 

Project requests should be emailed to twc.serviceordersupport@twcable.com. 
The subject line should state: Project Request/ATN/AN. The body of the email should include the number of telephone numbers porting, desired due date (DDD), and the purchase order number (PON) to be submitted. 
Once approved, TWC will respond with a project code to be placed in the project field (field 20) on the LSR. LSRs submitted with more than 20 telephone numbers that do not include the approved project code will be rejected. LSRs submitted as a project are subject to normal LSR validation.


                                             
                                        




4. Simple Ports 


This section addresses wireline-to-wireline and intermodal ports.  Intermodal refers to ports between wireline and wireless providers.  Simple Ports:

Involve a single line account only 
Do not involve unbundled network elements (no loop with number port) 
Do not include complex switch translations such as Centrex, direct inward dialing (DID) numbers, or Advanced Intelligent Network (AIN) service 
Do not include remote call forwarding numbers 
Do not include multiple services on the loop such as broadband or other data services 
Do not include a line that has been resold






4.1  Simple Port Validation Fields


The four fields that can be required for validation are: 

Customer account number 
Zip code 
Telephone number to be ported 
Pass code *
Do not include multiple services on the loop such as broadband or other data services 

Note: The pass code field is optional unless the pass code has been requested and   assigned by the end user.





4.2  Simple Port Required Fields


The following information fields should be completed to facilitate processing of the LSR.

Ported Telephone Number:  identifies the telephone number or consecutive range of telephone numbers residing in the same switch to be ported.
Account Number:  identifies the account number assigned by the new service provider.
Zip Code:  identifies the zip code of the end user’s service address and validates that the correct user’s number has been sent on the port request.
Company Code:  identifies the exchange carrier initiating the transaction
New Network Service Provider (Conditional): identifies the Number Portability Administration Center (NPAC) service provider identifier (SPI) of the new provider.
Desired Due Date (DDD):  identifies the customer’s desired due date for the port
Purchase Order Number (PON):  identifies the customer’s unique purchase order or requisition number that authorizes issuance of the request or supplement.
Version (Conditional): identifies the submitting service provider’s order version number and enables service providers to track orders internally and make changes or modifications. 
Number Portability Direction Indicator:  allows the new service provider to direct the correct administration of E-911 records.
Customer Carrier Name Abbreviation:  three-letter code that identifies the company that submitted the LSR and the company to whom response messages must be returned.
Requisition Type and Status:  specifies the type of order to be processed.
Activity:  identifies the activity involved in the service request.
Telephone Number of the Initiator:  provides the telephone number for the initiator of the port request.
Agency Authority Status:  indicates that the customer is acting as an end user’s agent and has an authorization on file. 






4.3  LSR Simple Port Rules


 




4.3.1  Business Days for Simple Ports


Business Days for Simple Ports Business days are Monday through Friday, 8am – 5pm local time, excluding weekends and holidays.
The cutoff time for receipt of a valid simple port LSR in order for the simple port to be eligible for activation at 12:00am on the following business day is 1:00pm. 
The NPAC has seven regions that cover the United States. The times referenced above are based on local time in the predominant time zone of the NPAC Region that contains the number to be ported.

Northeast NPAC Region:  Eastern time
Mid-Atlantic NPAC Region:  Eastern time
Southeast NPAC Region:  Eastern time
Midwest NPAC Region:  Central time 
Southwest NPAC Region:  Central time
West Coast NPAC Region:  Pacific time
Western NPAC Region:  Mountain time






4.3.2  Non-Qualifying Simple Ports


After determining that a simple port request is non-simple, TWC may issue a firm order commitment (FOC) within four hours with a different due date if the LSR contains sufficient data for a non-simple port. If the LSR contains insufficient data, it may be rejected.
The final determination as to whether a port out request is a simple port is made by TWC, consistent with the applicable regulations.






4.4 FOC Intervals



Simple Port: LSR-to-FOC Intervals
All simple port LSRs received by the 1:00pm cutoff time will be responded to (FOC or reject) within four clock hours. Simple port LSRs received after the 1:00pm cutoff will be considered to have been received on the following business day. 

Simple Port: LSR-to-FOC Intervals
(Illustration)





Accurate/Complete Local Service Request (LSR) Received
Firm Order Confirmation (FOC) or Reject Due Back by Day/Time


Mon 8:00am through 8:59am
Mon 12:00pm (noon) through 12:59pm


Mon 9:00am through 9:59am
Mon 1:00pm through 1:59pm


Mon 10:00am through 10:59am
Mon 2:00pm through 2:59pm


Mon 11:00am through 11:59am
Mon 3:00pm through 3:59pm


Mon 12:00pm (noon) through 12:59pm
Mon 4:00pm through 4:59pm


Mon 1:00pm
Mon 5:00pm


Mon 1:01pm through Tues 7:59am
Tues 12:00pm (noon)








5. Complex/Commercial Porting Orders


A Complex port out request may contain 1 to 20 telephone numbers.  Port out requests for more than 20 telephone numbers constitute a project and the interval will be negotiated.
Account number (AN), end user account number (EAN), and account telephone number (ATN) are required to process a Complex LSR. The AN and EAN should be populated with the customer’s TWC account number and the ATN should be populated with the customer’s TWC account TN.





5.1   Validation Fields


All complex port out orders must carry the TWC required combination of the five field decision validations:

Account number
End user last name
End user service address house number
TN
ZIP





5.  Complex/Commercial Porting Orders


A Complex port out request may contain 1 to 20 telephone numbers.  Port out requests for more than 20 telephone numbers constitute a project and the interval will be negotiated.
Account number (AN), end user account number (EAN), and account telephone number (ATN) are required to process a Complex LSR. The AN and EAN should be populated with the customer’s TWC account number and the ATN should be populated with the customer’s TWC account TN.




5.2    LSR Address Fields


The following fields are included on the TWC GUI.  Please See TWC Field Level LSR Guide for Required verses Conditional fields. 

SAPR (Street Address Number Prefix)
SANO (Service Address Number)
SASF (Service Address Number Suffix)
SASD (Service Address Street Directional Prefix)
SASN (Service Address Street Name)
SASS (Service Address Street Directional Suffix)
SATH (Service Address Street Directional Suffix)
CITY  (Service Address City)
STATE (Service Address State)
ZIP (Service Address Zip)






5.3   Ordering Information


Following are guidelines intended to assist in placing LSRs for Porting numbers out from Time Warner Cable.

Port orders received in complex format must pass complex edits prior to resolving one day vs. complex to determine due date.  DDD for non-simple ports must be a minimum of three business days from the LSR submission date. If the LSR is submitted before 3pm EST this will count as day one. LSRs submitted after 3pm EST are considered to be received the next business day.  The NNSP field is required on all requests for number portability.
In instances where the LSR indicates the port request is non-simple based on the current FCC definition and rule for a simple port, TWC will return a FOC or appropriate response within 24 clock hours.
TWC creates the SV in NPAC for number portability requests.
The NNSP will be responsible for concurring with the SV in order to proceed with the porting process.
Where technically feasible, TWC will apply the ten-digit trigger (TDT) to all TNs being ported out. The TDT will be placed in the switch the day prior to the FOC due date. If the parties agree to a coordinated hot cut, TWC will allow the NNSP 30 minutes from the desired frame due time to activate the telephone number in NPAC. If 30 minutes expires and the TN has not been activated, TWC will rewrite the internal order and send a cancellation notice via TWC GUI. If any of the telephone numbers need to be ported, a new LSR will be required by the NNSP to process the request.
If a coordinated hot cut is not requested, numbers activated by the NNSP in NPAC will be removed from the TWC switch the day following activation by the NNSP.  Telephone numbers will not be removed from the TWC switch until the NPAC version has been activated by the NNSP.
The FOC is only good for five business days past the due date on the FOC. The NPAC SV will be cancelled the sixth day following the FOC due date if activation has not occurred in NPAC or if a supplemental LSR has not been submitted. TWC will rewrite the internal order and send a cancellation notice via TWC GUI. If any of the canceled TNs need to be ported, a new LSR will be required by the NNSP to process the request.
When a disconnection activity type is submitted for a TWC native TN, the number must be in a pending-disconnect status in NPAC.
Any port out order of more than 20 lines requires a negotiated due date and may require a coordinated cutover.  The NNSP must contact TWC to negotiate the due date and the necessity of a coordinated cutover.  For orders of more than 20 lines, contact TWC Carrier Relations Organization at: carrier@twcable.com.
LSR status (FOC or cancel) will be provided within 24 hours of receipt for requests with 1 to 20 TNs. For LSRs containing over 20 TNs, responses will be sent within 72 hours of receipt. These intervals are not applicable in cases where states have specific interval rules associated with this activity. 
Requests with one stand-a-lone residential telephone number will be assigned a FOC date of four business days from the day a clean LSR was received. Requests with 1 to 20 TNs will be assigned a FOC date of 5 business days to complete the procedure from the day a clean LSR was received. TWC considers port out requests of more than 20 TNs a project and the interval will be negotiated. A response will be received within 48 hours informing of the due date issued. The regional office will review the request and provide FOC as appropriate to the size and complexity of the request via the normal confirmation process. 





5.4  Supplement Requests


If the order is in FOC “Accept”, then changing the due date for less than five business days does not require a supplement. TWC will accept a supplement up to 3pm EST the day before the due date or FOC expiration date.   The NNSP must issue a supplemental order to TWC to identify any modifications to the original request.  All modifications to the original request will impact the original confirmed due date. Supplement requests received on the desired due date can experience technical difficulties; therefore, it is recommended that supplements be sent 24 hours prior to the desired due date.



5.5  Partial Port Indicator


A partial port out affects only the telephone numbers identified on the NNSP’s LSR.  The TNs not identified on the LSR remain in service with TWC and are billed appropriately. To assist with the identification and proper processing of partial port out orders, TWC requests the population of a full/partial port indicator on the LSR by the NNSP.
Note: TWC does not accept expedited port out requests (advancing the standard DD) from any service provider, unless there is a service-impacting situation caused by TWC. 



5.6  Service Restrictions


The following service restrictions apply when porting out from TWC:

Ported TNs port within the constraints placed on them by the FCC and specific state regulations. 
The numbers listed below are examples of numbers, which are not portable, as well as their underlying provisioned TN:

555, 960 and 976 NXXs
500, 700, 900, 911 services
Other N11 codes (e.g. 411, 511)

Numbers used for mass calling events cannot be ported.
The TWC policy, regarding the porting of reserved TNs, is to allow porting when reserved numbers are on the end-user service record.
Porting service request restricted on unassigned, previously owned, disconnected, disconnected following suspension for non-payment, or numbers associated with paging services cannot be ported.




5.7  Expedited LSRs


TWC does not accept expedited port requests (advancing the standard DD interval) unless there is a service-impacting situation.  TWC will only consider support of an expedited port on an individual case basis with particular focus on preventing the customer from being out of service.  NNSP must notify and receive approval from the CLEC Operations contact before advancing the due date. If approval is received to advance the DDD less than the standard LSR interval (three days), the expedite field must be populated with a Y.



5.8  Cancellations


For service assurance, it is best to submit cancel requests (SUP1) by 3pm EST the day before the due date or FOC expiration date.  For anything after 3pm the day before, contact:

For residential and commercial orders:  CLEC Operations at 877-594-6039, select option 1, and TWC will try their best to accommodate.

Note: For special projects service assurance, TWC must receive the cancel request (SUP1) by 3pm two days prior to the due date to prevent service interruption.



5.8.1  Same Day Cancellation Contact


For same day cancellations, or next day cancellations submitted after 3pm, submit the cancel request (SUP1) and call TWC to notify of cancellation.  For residential and commercial cancellations, call CLEC Operations at 877-594-6039.



5.8.2  Cancel FOC Policy


TNs not activated at NPAC within five business days from the FOC due date will be canceled by TWC (SPID 853C).  TWC will cancel the subscription at NPAC and issue a cancellation notice to the former NNSP.  If any of the canceled numbers need to be ported, a new LSR will be required by the NNSP to process the request.
















^ Back to Top















Business Directories by State
































Locations

            Top States:

                Florida
- (7,668,568 Businesses)
California
- (7,998,712 Businesses)
Texas
- (4,844,132 Businesses)
New York
- (4,451,440 Businesses)
Pennsylvania
- (1,273,348 Businesses)

Advertisements









States












                                                        Alabama
                                                    




                                                        424,733 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        529,179 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Alaska
                                                    




                                                        90,124 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        119,266 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Arizona
                                                    




                                                        757,578 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        800,057 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Arkansas
                                                    




                                                        263,265 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        325,845 People Found
                                                    










                                                        California
                                                    




                                                        7,998,712 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        7,373,829 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Colorado
                                                    




                                                        810,965 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        814,457 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Connecticut
                                                    




                                                        468,529 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        572,170 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Delaware
                                                    




                                                        132,203 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        114,760 People Found
                                                    










                                                        District Of Columbia
                                                    




                                                        101,098 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        225,569 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Florida
                                                    




                                                        7,668,568 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        10,379,305 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Georgia
                                                    




                                                        1,255,913 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,396,340 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Hawaii
                                                    




                                                        129,778 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        152,776 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Idaho
                                                    




                                                        172,946 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        201,511 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Illinois
                                                    




                                                        1,181,777 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,483,851 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Indiana
                                                    




                                                        578,336 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        719,895 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Iowa
                                                    




                                                        329,478 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        460,060 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Kansas
                                                    




                                                        282,167 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        348,203 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Kentucky
                                                    




                                                        405,364 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        504,609 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Louisiana
                                                    




                                                        633,706 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        615,570 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Maine
                                                    




                                                        130,772 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        174,828 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Maryland
                                                    




                                                        674,762 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        710,573 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Massachusetts
                                                    




                                                        726,391 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,027,525 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Michigan
                                                    




                                                        934,309 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,131,011 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Minnesota
                                                    




                                                        592,079 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        758,211 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Mississippi
                                                    




                                                        261,251 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        322,667 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Missouri
                                                    




                                                        597,997 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        706,323 People Found
                                                    














                                                        Montana
                                                    




                                                        130,347 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        158,428 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Nebraska
                                                    




                                                        191,594 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        279,673 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Nevada
                                                    




                                                        1,037,013 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,194,143 People Found
                                                    










                                                        New Hampshire
                                                    




                                                        154,616 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        193,717 People Found
                                                    










                                                        New Jersey
                                                    




                                                        974,361 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,091,903 People Found
                                                    










                                                        New Mexico
                                                    




                                                        178,355 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        231,696 People Found
                                                    










                                                        New York
                                                    




                                                        4,451,440 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        2,890,350 People Found
                                                    










                                                        North Carolina
                                                    




                                                        989,346 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,123,727 People Found
                                                    










                                                        North Dakota
                                                    




                                                        81,418 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        101,993 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Ohio
                                                    




                                                        1,062,590 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,335,494 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Oklahoma
                                                    




                                                        379,566 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        422,307 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Oregon
                                                    




                                                        510,731 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        621,776 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Pennsylvania
                                                    




                                                        1,273,348 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,546,222 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Puerto Rico
                                                    




                                                        55,527 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        60,845 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Rhode Island
                                                    




                                                        111,772 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        132,878 People Found
                                                    










                                                        South Carolina
                                                    




                                                        406,911 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        483,894 People Found
                                                    










                                                        South Dakota
                                                    




                                                        92,785 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        126,265 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Tennessee
                                                    




                                                        620,250 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        751,954 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Texas
                                                    




                                                        4,844,132 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        5,747,634 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Utah
                                                    




                                                        363,011 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        377,419 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Vermont
                                                    




                                                        81,906 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        106,956 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Virginia
                                                    




                                                        911,909 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,016,492 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Washington
                                                    




                                                        830,493 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        864,074 People Found
                                                    










                                                        West Virginia
                                                    




                                                        136,960 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        185,319 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Wisconsin
                                                    




                                                        486,944 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        707,971 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Wyoming
                                                    




                                                        77,247 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        90,781 People Found
                                                    













                Company Directory:
            
            Browse directory by company name:
            
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
(more)







People Directory: 

            Names starting with letters:

            
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
















You must be signed in to print.
Once signed in, look for the PDF button.














Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











 QuickCorps.Com | Form an LLC or incorporate for business online today
































Incorporate Now















Launch Your Business 
With Speed And Value


Packages starting at $39 plus state filing fees.
Free 1st Year Registered Agent. 
All orders include free shipping.

Get Started











Start Your Business In 3 Easy Steps






1


Select a Package
We provide a side by side comparison of each of our packages. Select the package that is most suitable to your business needs.






2


Complete Order Form
Provide information about your company based on the selected state of incorporation.






3


Receive Your Documents
We do the work for you to draft your articles and work with the state to file your company. Upon completion we will mail your filed company formation documents to the address you provide.






What's included in each package?
See Plans & Pricing









How Does it Work

Once your order is placed we will begin processing the formation of your company. If additional information is required we will contact you for the necessary information. We handle your formation from beginning to end and make sure that your formation is filed quickly and correctly.





Review  Order Details

Every new order is reviewed for accuracy and conformity to state filing guidelines.



Name  Availability Search

A thorough name search is conducted with the state to ascertain the availability of the company name.



Prepare  and File Documents

Articles of Incorporation / Organization are prepared and delivered to the governing state agency.



Deliver  Filed Documents

The filed articles along with any additional services are mailed to the client.












Get a Quick Quote







Select Entity Type
LLC
S-Corporation
C-Corporation
Nonprofit






Select State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
Washington DC
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming








Get Started Now














How can we help you?



Client Support 





Name *



Email Address *



Phone Number *



Message *





Send Message



Thanks for your message! We'll get back to you as soon as we can.

Send Other













Bill Explanation and Payment Options | Spectrum
























































Skip To Content


































































Billing & Payments





















                    Ask TWC - Virtual Assistant
                







 Go



















Find the answers to questions our customers ask most often, such as:








Can I purchase my own internet modem?








How do I get a new remote control?








How do I make a payment?








What if I have problems logging in?








Where can I replace or return my TWC Internet hardware?






















Understand your bill and payment options





We’ve designed the billing statement with you in mind. The sample bill provided is designed to explain the information contained within your monthly billing statement.










Reasons your bill may change






There are various reasons why your bill may be more (or less) than usual:






We often offer promotional pricing when you sign up for services, and that pricing is available only for a limited time (e.g. $49.99 per month for 12 months). Once a discount expires, there will be an increase to either a new promotional rate or to retail rates. Note: You’ll be notified on your bill when pricing changes.
If you’ve recently changed your service, pro-rated charges may be shown on your bill. Pro-rated charges are partial-month charges and ensure that you will be charged only for the number of days the services were used for that billing period.
If your service was just installed, you might see one-time fees included for installation or activation of services.
You or someone in your household may have purchased Pay-Per-View or On Demand programming. Please review your bill to view a list of the movies titles and live events and the date on which they were purchased.










Ways to pay your bill






You can pay your bill through a variety of options, including online through My Account or the My TWC® App, in person, by phone, by mail or via live chat on a computer.
Note: The following forms of payment are accepted regardless of how you choose to pay your bill:

Credit cards: American Express, Discover, MasterCard and Visa

Debit cards: MasterCard and Visa
 

Additional forms of eligible payment vary by option.






Making a payment online with My Account




Paying your bill online with My Account is free.
Making a one-time payment

Sign into My Account using your TWC ID (Don't have a TWC ID? Learn how to register for one.)
On the My Account tab, go to Billing.
Click Pay My Bill.
Choose One-Time for the Payment Frequency.
Select your payment method (credit card, debit card or bank account).







Watch video on how to make a one-time payment in My Account








 
Setting up a Recurring Payments Method

Sign into My Account using your TWC ID.
On the My Account tab, go to Billing.
Click Pay My Bill.
Choose Recurring for the Payment Frequency.

Select your payment method (credit card, debit card or bank account).







Watch video on how to sign up for recurring payments in My Account








 
In addition to the general forms of payment listed above, you may also pay by Electronic Funds Transfer (EFT) from your checking or savings account with My Account.










Making a payment with the My TWC® app




The first step is to download the My TWC® app from Google Play for your Android OS device or from the App Store for your iOS device.
Once the My TWC® app is installed:

Open and sign in to the My TWC® app with your TWC ID.
Select Pay Bill on the My Account tab.
Follow the on-screen instructions as they walk you through the process for making a one-time payment.

In addition to the general forms of payment listed above, you may also pay by Electronic Funds Transfer (EFT) from your checking or savings account with the My TWC® app.










Making a payment at a store location




You can make payments at any store location or designated payment center as long as it is within the same region from which the bill was generated. In other words, you cannot pay a bill for services in New York City at a Corpus Christi, Texas, store location/payment center because these are different regions.
Find a store location/payment center near you
In addition to the general forms of payment listed above , you may also pay by cash, check or money order when paying in person. Please note that a payment processing fee may apply for cash and check payments.










Making a payment by phone




Use your credit card or bank checking account to pay your bill at your convenience via phone. Tip: Have your printed bill and credit card handy.

Call 1-855-70-SPECTRUM.
Say "pay my bill" when asked why you are calling.
Follow the voice-activated prompts to complete the bill pay transaction.

Note: A fee of $5.00 is charged when an agent assists you in making a payment via phone.
In addition to the general forms of payment listed above, you may also pay by check by phone when paying by phone. Please note that a payment processing fee may apply if you reach a live agent.










Making a payment through the mail




In addition to the general forms of payment listed above, you may also pay by check or money order by mail.
Guidelines for paying by mail:

For prompt processing of your payment, mail it to the address listed on your bill and use the appropriate postage.
Include either your current billing statement in the return envelope and/or write your account number on your check or money order.
When paying by mail, we recommend that you use a check or money order, payable to Time Warner Cable. For your security, please avoid sending cash through the mail.











Making a payment via live chat




Payments made through live chat must be done from a computer. Note: Payments cannot be accepted via live chat on a smartphone or tablet at this time.
Tip: Have your printed bill and credit card or checkbook handy.

Let the chat agent know you are interested in making a payment.
The chat agent will send you a secure form through the chat.
Complete the form with the necessary payment details and click Submit to return it to the chat agent.
The chat agent will provide a confirmation number once the payment is processed.

Note: A fee of $5.00 is charged when an agent assists you in making a payment via live chat.










Moving? Transfer your service




Take Spectrum with you. Go to our My Move® page to see if your new address is located in a Spectrum service area.




























Community Forums

















Go to support overview

















Find a location near you

















Contact us












































Filing Documents
















Public Utility Commission of Texas 
FILINGS 


USER:
		NONE
		-
		9999


Case 45321-1







Case Style
JOINT APPLICATION CENTRAL TELEPHONE COMPANY OF TEXAS, INC. dba CENTURYLINK AND TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (TEXAS), LLC FOR APPROVAL OF AN INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT



Filing Description
JOINT APPLICATION CENTRAL TELEPHONE COMPANY OF TEXAS, INC. dba CENTURYLINK AND TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (TEXAS), LLC FOR APPROVAL OF AN INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT





 DescriptionTypeAvailable






Download



Native Files (Zip)


ZIP



Yes







Download



Pages 1 to 50


PDF



Yes







Download



Pages 51 to 100


PDF



Yes







Download



Pages 101 to 150


PDF



Yes







Download



Pages 151 to 192


PDF



Yes


5 Documents











| PUCT Home | State of Texas |
						TRAIL |
						
PUC Policies


								Copyright 1998-2015 Public Utility Commission of Texas.
								
								1701 N. Congress Ave., PO Box 13326, Austin, TX 78711-3326
								General Information 512-936-7000
								Customer Hot Line 1-888-782-8477 or e-mail: customer@puc.texas.gov

								All Rights Reserved.


							For site Interchange issues or problems please contact: helpdesk@puc.texas.gov

							For site issues and suggestions please contact: web@puc.texas.gov














Contact Us | Contact Number | Contact Support





















































 
 








































































                
                    
                    Business Home
                    
                
            

                
                    
                    Support
                    
                
            

                
                    
                    Contact Us
                    
                
            






 

















  



















































Spectrum Support Center
























































Skip To Content














































































Customer Support





















                    Ask TWC - Virtual Assistant
                







 Go



















Find the answers to questions our customers ask most often, such as:








Can I purchase my own internet modem?








How do I get a new remote control?








How do I make a payment?








What if I have problems logging in?








Where can I replace or return my TWC Internet hardware?








































Support Overview



Welcome




Self-Service Tools








Account & Billing



    Overview





    Billing




    Service Changes




    Registration




    Manage Your Account








TV



    Overview




    Get Connected




On-screen Guide & Channels




    Adapters & CableCARD™




    Cable Boxes




    Remotes








Internet



    Overview




    Get Connected




    Manage WiFi





    Internet Security





    Internet Modems





    Wireless Routers








Phone



    Overview





    Get Connected





    Manage Phone Features





    Phone Modems








Home Security



    Overview





    Get Connected





    Home Management Rules





    FAQs





    Equipment Manuals








TWC Mail



    Overview





    Email Setup





    Manage Accounts


















Welcome






Use the quick links below to find popular solutions, search the Ask TWC - Virtual Assistant for answers or sign in to My Account or the My TWC® app to pay your bill, activate and troubleshoot equipment and more.











My Account









Troubleshoot in My Account










Access My Account







TWC ID Support












My TWC® app









Troubleshoot in My TWC® app










Download the app:

  





















Try These Solutions First






















Account & Billing







Learn how to pay your bill, register for a TWC ID, manage your account, manage appointments and more.











Bill payment options







Install services yourself







Transfer or cancel service







Recent bill changes










































TV







Troubleshoot your TV service, find local channels, understand The Guide, see how to program your remote control, learn about Digital Adapters and more.











TV troubleshooting







How to find channels







Remote control support







Digital Adapters










































Internet







Retrieve or change your WiFi password, check for outages, troubleshoot your Internet service, learn about free Security Suite software and more.











Home WiFi (Wireless Networking)







Lease or buy a modem







Internet troubleshooting







Modem activation







Alert for Windows 10 Users










































Phone







Find troubleshooting steps and see how to manage your phone features in VoiceZone®.











Phone troubleshooting







Calling features







Voicemail setup







Phone 2 Go app










































Home Security







Access the IntelligentHome customer website or use the IntelligentHome app to program and manage your IntelligentHome security system.











IntelligentHome customer website








IntelligentHome app







IntelligentHome service - Call 1-855-632-60601-855-632-6060










































TWC Mail







Learn how to set up, access and manage your TWC Mail accounts.











Check your email








Retrieve your email password








Server settings







Setting up TWC Mail


























Self-Service Tools





Get the most out of your services with apps for your mobile devices and support tools online.





MY ACCOUNT & MY TWC® APP







           Use My Account or the My TWC® app to pay your bill, activate and troubleshoot equipment, manage settings for your TV, Internet and Phone service, receive up-to-the-minute service alerts and more. A TWC ID is required.
        










My Account








Sign in to My Account







Not registered? Register for a TWC ID







Can’t sign in? Reset your password












My TWC® app








Learn details about the app







Download the app:

  

















WIFI TOOLS & APPS











Internet speed





Check the upload and download speed from your Internet modem.





Take a speed test








WiFi Finder® app





Locate hundreds of thousands of WiFi hotspots nationwide for fast reliable Internet on-the-go.





Learn about TWC WiFi Finder® app






Download the app:

  
















WiFi





Register your family’s devices to connect to our nationwide hotspot network.





Go to My WiFi
















TV TOOLS & APPS











Program your remote





Find device codes to program your remote control to your TV.





Search for your remote








Spectrum TV app





Watch your favorite shows in the comfort of your home, the gym, a coffee shop — virtually anywhere on multiple devices.





Using the Spectrum TV app






Download the app:

    












PHONE TOOLS & APPS











VoiceZone®





Manage your Voicemail and other phone features with the online portal called VoiceZone®.





Go to VoiceZone









Phone 2 Go app





Understand how to navigate the app, adjust settings and troubleshoot. 





Phone 2 Go support 












TWC MAIL TOOLS







TWC Mail
Manage your mail preferences, create sub-users, set mailbox size, block messages and more.









Access Subscriber Self Care






Reset password









Retrieve username













RESOURCES












See how Ask TWC can help you








Community forums









How-to videos

















Account & Billing Overview






Learn how to register for a TWC ID so that you can manage your account and pay your bill online, watch TV using apps, use WiFi hotspots and much more.







Use your TWC ID to access My Account or the My TWC® app to troubleshoot equipment issues.











My Account









Troubleshoot in My Account










Access My Account







TWC ID Support












My TWC® app









Troubleshoot in My TWC® app










Download the app:

  



































Billing
Learn about the many bill payment options and how to understand your bill statement.





Take control of your bill





























Service Changes
Learn about self-installation options and find help for moving, transferring or adding services.





See how to make changes





























Registration
Learn how to register for a TWC ID and retrieve a forgotten password.





Start with a TWC ID





























Manage Your Account
The online tool My Account and the My TWC® app put you in control. Understand the benefits and how they work for you. You can pay your bill, reschedule and manage your appointments and more.





Understand the tools





























Resources









Bill payment options










Transfer or cancel service
















Recent bill changes




























Billing





PAYING YOUR BILL 











Paying your bill is more convenient than ever before with these options -- online via My Account, through the My TWC® app, by phone, in person, by mail.











View and pay your bill online







One-time and recurring payments







Setting up future-dated payments







Paying your bill with My TWC® app








Making payments in My Account



















UNDERSTANDING YOUR BILL











Let us help you take the mystery out of your monthly statement. 











Bill explanation and sample bill







Bill tax descriptions







Retail rates







Find your 4-digit Customer/Security Code


















FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS









What are my bill payment options?







How much will I pay once my promotion has ended?










Why did the amount of my bill change?







View Billing FAQs





















Service Changes





SELF-INSTALLATION











Easy Connect Kits empower you to install your TV, Internet or Phone without a visit from a technician and whenever it's convenient for you.











Learn about Easy Connect Kits







Easy Connect Kit support & instructions







Activating your new modem







Activating your Digital Adapter







Add new service






















MAKING CHANGES





Add or upgrade services online







Transfer service







Moving







Seasonal account status







Contact us to remove channels or services.














RESOURCES





Welcome new customers








See how Ask TWC helps you find what you need


























Registration





SIGN UP FOR A TWC ID 











A TWC ID allows you to view & pay your bill, activate and troubleshoot your equipment, connect to WiFi hotspots, watch live TV online, manage voicemail and program your DVR. 











Sign up now







Registering for a TWC ID







TWC ID Support







Reset your TWC ID password








See how to register from home











See how to register away from home
























Manage Your Account





MY ACCOUNT











Access to online bill pay options, the ability to update your account information, and tools to help manage your TV, Internet and Phone services all in one convenient location.











Manage your account online







Managing user access







Instructions for paying your bill








Using My Account



















MY TWC® APP











Manage your account from anywhere, review your bill, manage service appointments, and set up call forwarding with the My TWC® app.











Download the app:

  







Managing your account








Features of My TWC® App



















MANAGING APPOINTMENTS











View, reschedule or cancel appointments easily within My Account or the My TWC® app.











Rescheduling or canceling appointments







Managing appointments with My Account







Managing appointments with My TWC® app








Managing your appointments





















RESOURCES









Register for a TWC ID







Reset your TWC ID password







View My Account FAQs










View My TWC® app FAQs







View Appointment FAQs





















TV Support Overview






Find guided troubleshooting, get help with installation and equipment activation, locate channels and see how to use The Guide.





Use your TWC ID to access My Account or the My TWC® app to troubleshoot equipment issues.











My Account









Troubleshoot in My Account










Access My Account







TWC ID Support












My TWC® app









Troubleshoot in My TWC® app










Download the app:

  


























 

 








Get Connected
Find help with missing channels, picture quality and equipment.





Start troubleshooting





























On-screen Guide & Channels
Discover tips about The Guide -- finding shows, setting favorite channels, using parental controls. Find local channels and listings. Learn about On Demand and Pay-Per-View.





Find channels





























Adapters & CableCARD™
A Digital Adapter or a CableCARD™ allows you to view digital TV services without needing a cable Set-Top Box.





Installation & activation help





























Equipment
Find user guides and learn how to program your remote to your devices.








Cable box user guides







Program your remote





















Get Connected





CHANNELS & PICTURE











Find help with TV issues, such as missing channels or picture quality. 











TV troubleshooting








See how to troubleshoot TV 



















SELF-INSTALLATION











Easy Connect Kits empower you to install your TV, Internet or Phone when it's convenient for you and without a visit from a technician.











Learn about Easy Connect Kits







Easy Connect Kit instructions







Activating new TV equipment







Activating Digital Adapter







Activate a CableCARD™








See how to install TV service yourself



















REMOTES











Locate instructions and programming codes for your devices or replace your current or lost remote at a local store location.











Program your remote







Find your local store








Contact us


















RESOURCES









Report cable theft








View TV FAQs





















On-screen Guide & Channels





THE GUIDE











           Our interactive programming Guide helps you find shows to watch, mark channels as favorites, use parental controls and pause live TV -- all by using your remote control.
        










Using The Guide







Parental controls







Closed captioning







Troubleshooting channel issues
















FINDING CHANNELS











           See a list of channels based on your TV package.
        










See what’s on with TV listings









View your local channel lineup







Note for customers with Digital Adapters: 
On the channel lineup page, download the PDF for your lineup, which includes an indicator for channels not available with a Digital Adapter.
















ON DEMAND











           Learn how to access and use On Demand programming.
        










On Demand support







Watch On Demand online









Using On Demand











Free On Demand



















PAY-PER-VIEW











           Where to find and how to order Pay-Per-View events using your remote. 
        










Pay-Per-View ordering & support







Pay-Per-View FAQs








See a list of PPV channels by area

















APPS











           With a TV subscription and Internet access from Time Warner Cable, you can watch TV on your favorite devices. 
        










App support







Using the Spectrum TV app







Watch TV online now








Spectrum TV app details







My TWC® app details







See all apps


















FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS









How do I watch TV on my laptop?







How do I access HBO GO®/MAX GO®?










View Guide FAQs







View programming FAQs





















Adapters & CableCARD™





DIGITAL ADAPTERS 











A Digital Adapter is a small converter, about the size of a deck of cards, that allows you to view digital TV services on your television without the need for a Set-Top Box.











Learn more about Digital Adapters







Installing and activating








See how to install your Digital Adapter



















CableCARD™











A CableCARD™ is a small device you install in your TV that allows you to view digital TV services without needing a cable Set-Top Box.











Activate your CableCARD™







Install a CableCARD™


















RESOURCES











View Digital Adapter FAQs







View CableCARD™ FAQs














Cable Boxes





USER GUIDES







See our full list of cable boxes or choose here from our most common models:








Download Adobe Reader














 
Explorer 8300/8300HD DVR











User Guide





Setup Wizard





Multi-room DVR system guide








 
Cisco Explorer 4640HDC











User Guide














 
Motorola DCX3400M











User Guide








 
Samsung SMT-H3262











User Guide


















View all TV cable boxes









RESOURCES









Fix errors on your cable box








Troubleshoot using My Account













Resolve recording conflicts





















Remotes





USER GUIDES







See our full list of remote controls or choose here from our most common models:








Download Adobe Reader














 
Universal Clikr-5 UR5U 8780L











User Guide
Codes and more details








 
Philips RC122











User Guide
Codes and more details














 
Universal Clikr-5 UR5U 8790L











User Guide
Codes and more details








 
DTA Remote Cisco











User Guide
Codes and more details


















View all TV remotes









RESOURCES









Program your remote








Find local store to replace remote





















Internet Support Overview






Find guided troubleshooting and see how to manage your Home WiFi and Internet security.





Use your TWC ID to access My Account or the My TWC® app to troubleshoot equipment issues.











My Account









Troubleshoot in My Account










Access My Account







TWC ID Support












My TWC® app









Troubleshoot in My TWC® app










Download the app:

  


























 

 








Get Connected
Learn how to retrieve or change your WiFi password and troubleshoot.





Start troubleshooting





Alert for Windows 10 Users





























Manage WiFi
Discover tips for optimizing your home WiFi connection and learn how to connect when you’re away from home.





Take control of your WiFi




















 

 








Internet Security
Learn about free Security Suite by McAfee®, which protects your computers and family from online threats.





Installation & activation help




















 
 

 
 








Equipment
Find user guides, learn the proper way to reboot your modem and learn WiFi basics.





Modem user guides





Wireless router user guides





























Resources












Forgot your WiFi password?







Lease or buy your modem















Troubleshooting your Internet







Activating a new modem


























Get Connected





GUIDED TROUBLESHOOTING











View guided troubleshooting and learn what affects speed. Sign in to My Account or use the My TWC® app to troubleshoot your devices. A TWC ID is required.











Forgot your WiFi password?







Troubleshooting your Internet







Rebooting your modem/router







Factors that affect speed








Rebooting your modem



















SELF-INSTALLATION











Easy Connect Kits empower you to install your TV, Internet or Phone when it's convenient for you and without a visit from a technician.











Learn about Easy Connect Kits







Easy Connect Kit instructions







Activating a new modem








Installing Internet service yourself





















RESOURCES









Lease or buy your modem







Test your Internet speed







Internet browsers










Learn about IPv6







View Internet FAQs





















Manage WiFi





HOME WIFI











           Manage your Home WiFi network name, password and security settings and learn what impacts WiFi performance.
        










Forgot your WiFi password?







Manage settings and connection problems







Maximize WiFi performance
















WIFI HOTSPOTS 











           Need help connecting? Find sign-in help, register your devices and locate hotspots with the TWC WiFi Finder® app.  
        










Sign-in help







Connecting to TWC WiFi® Hotspots







Register & manage devices








App details







 
Download the TWC WiFi Finder® app:

  
 


















RESOURCES









Internet Usage Tracker







View WiFi Hotspots FAQs










View Home WiFi FAQs





















Internet Security





SECURE YOUR CONNECTION











Protect your computers and family from online threats with free Security Suite by McAfee®. Use your TWC email and password to register.











Register for free Security Suite








Downloading and installing McAfee







Parental controls







Uninstalling security software
















AVOID ABUSE











Learn how to protect yourself from email scams and Internet abuse. Report abuse and review the Internet policies.











Abuse and scams







Internet best practices


















RESOURCES









View parental controls FAQs







View security FAQs










Viruses, malware and threats FAQs





















Internet Modems





USER GUIDES







See our full list of internet modems or choose here from our most common models:








Download Adobe Reader














 
ARRIS TG1672G











Approved for Internet plans with download speeds of up to 300Mbps.





User Guide





Quick Install Guide








 
ARRIS TG862G











Approved for Internet plans with download speeds of up to 100Mbps.





User Guide














 
Ubee/Ambit DVW32CB











Approved for Internet plans with download speeds of up to 300Mbps.





User Guide





Quick Installation Guide








 
Technicolor/Thomson/RCA TC8717T











Approved for Internet plans with download speeds of up to 300Mbps.





User Guide





Quick Install Guide


















View All Internet Modems









RESOURCES









Lease or buy a modem







Activating a new modem










Rebooting your modem/router





















Wireless Routers





USER GUIDES







Routers listed here are stand-alone models. For modem-router combos, see Internet Modems.








Download Adobe Reader














 
Netgear WNR1000











User Guide








 
Netgear WGR614NA











User Guide














 
Sagemcom Fast 5260











User Guide
























RESOURCES









Learn the Home WiFi basics








Learn how to change your WiFi settings





















Phone Support Overview






Find guided troubleshooting and see how to manage your phone features in VoiceZone®.





Use your TWC ID to access My Account or the My TWC® app to troubleshoot equipment issues.











My Account









Troubleshoot in My Account










Access My Account







TWC ID Support












My TWC® app









Troubleshoot in My TWC® app










Download the app:

  



































Get Connected
Tools and tips for troubleshooting your Phone service, such as no dial tone or poor sound quality. Learn how to troubleshoot your devices.





Start troubleshooting





























Manage Phone Features
Learn about Voicemail as well as basic and advanced phone features, such as how to block unwanted telemarketing calls, assign distinctive ring tones and set up Voicemail notifications with VoiceZone®.





Take control of your features





























Phone Modems
Find user guides and learn how to activate a new phone modem.





Modem user guides





























Resources












Voicemail setup







Call Blocker Select















Calling features







Phone 2 Go


























Get Connected





GUIDED TROUBLESHOOTING











Tools and tips for troubleshooting your Phone service, such as no dial tone or poor sound quality.











Troubleshooting Phone service







Troubleshooting via My TWC® app








Troubleshoot in My Account











Troubleshoot in My TWC® app



















SELF-INSTALLATION











Easy Connect Kits empower you to install your TV, Internet or Phone when it's convenient for you and without a visit from a technician.











Learn about Easy Connect Kits







Easy Connect Kit instructions







Activating a new modem








See how to install Phone service yourself






























Manage Phone Features





VOICEZONE®











Sign in to VoiceZone® on your computer or the My TWC® app to manage your voicemail and phone features. A TWC ID is required.











Learn about  VoiceZone®







Access  VoiceZone® or register now








Managing features in  VoiceZone®







View  VoiceZone® FAQs
















VOICEMAIL











Listen to Voicemail from your phone or online. Have your messages transcribed into text and sent to your email or smartphone by adjusting the settings in VoiceZone®.











Voicemail setup







Retrieving Voicemail







PIN information







View Voicemail FAQs








Set up and use Voicemail



















BASIC & ADVANCED FEATURES











View guided instructions to block unwanted telemarketing calls, assign distinctive ring tones, set up voicemail notifications, Answer Anywhere and more. 











Managing Phone features







Accessing call history







Caller ID, star codes and other features







Phone backup power
















PHONE 2 GO











Phone 2 Go is an app that's included with your Phone plan that empowers you to answer landline calls on your linked cellphone or tablet, check voicemail and make calls when you're away from home -- even out of the country. A TWC ID is required to use the app. Register now











Phone 2 Go support







First-time setup 







View Phone 2 Go app FAQs





















Phone Modems





USER GUIDES







See our full list of Phone modems or choose here from our most common models:







Download Adobe Reader














 
ARRIS TG1672G











Approved for Internet plans with download speeds of up to 300Mbps.





User Guide





Quick Install Guide








 
ARRIS TG862G











Approved for Internet plans with download speeds of up to 100Mbps.





User Guide














 
Ubee/Ambit DVW32CB











Approved for Internet plans with download speeds of up to 300Mbps.





User Guide





Quick Installation Guide








 
Technicolor/Thomson/RCA TC8717T











Approved for Internet plans with download speeds of up to 300Mbps.





User Guide





Quick Install Guide


















View All Phone Modems









RESOURCES





View phone compatibility FAQs







Activate a new modem
















Home Security Support Overview






Access the customer portal or use the IntelligentHome app to program and manage your IntelligentHome security system. Select a link below to start.

        














 

 








Get Connected
Learn the IntelligentHome basics, see how to navigate the customer portal and use the IntelligentHome app.





Start here




















 

 








Home Management Rules
Learn about the home management settings that our users have told us are genius. See how you can make your home work for you and be more efficient.





Take control of your home





























FAQs
Find answers to Frequently Asked Questions about IntelligentHome.





See the FAQs




















 

 








Equipment Manuals
Download PDFs of the quick start guide, door lock instructions and more.





See available documents





























Resources





Access the customer portal








IntelligentHome videos







Download the app:

  
 





Call customer support -- 1-855-632-60621-855-632-6062

















Get Connected





UNDERSTANDING BASICS











           Learn about security zones, motion detectors, arming modes, alarms, notifications and how to change batteries.
        











See how your system works











Changing batteries



















CUSTOMER PORTAL 











Sign in to the portal to manage your home security settings, watch live and recorded video, personalize your home management rules and more. Note that your IntelligentHome username and password are not the same as your TWC ID.











Go to twc.com/ihcustomer








Retrieve your user name








Reset your password









How the customer website works



















INTELLIGENTHOME APP











Use the IntelligentHome app to program your thermostat, adjust lights, lock and unlock the door and more from anywhere.












Download the app:

  








See how the app works





















RESOURCES









Learn more about IntelligentHome







View IntelligentHome videos



























Home Management Rules





RULES FROM OUR USERS











           IntelligentHome customers have written to us, explaining their favorite home management features. Here they share with you steps for setting up some cool features.
        










Turn on light when door opens 







Send text if door doesn’t open 







Send video clip when door opens 







Lower smart thermostat during day 







Sound touchscreen alert at 7:30 AM 
















PERSONALIZE TOUCHSCREEN











           Did you know you can use your IntelligentHome Touchscreen as a digital frame using the free FotoFrame app?
        










Using FotoFrame to display photos 





















FAQs





POPULAR QUESTIONS











           Find answers to the most common questions about IntelligentHome.
        










What happens if I trip my panic alarm?







Whom do I contact if I need help with my IntelligentHome service?







Do I have to have a landline for the IntelligentHome monitoring system?







View IntelligentHome FAQs





















Equipment Manuals





GUIDES AND INSTRUCTIONS











Download PDFs of IntelligentHome brochures.






Requires Adobe Acrobat Reader













 Quick Start Guide









IntelligentHome product brochure









Kwikset door lock instructions






















TWC Mail Support Overview






Connect with family and friends using TWC Mail. Learn how to set up, access and manage your email accounts using the links below.
























Email Setup
Learn how to set up your email account for the first time, retrieve a forgotten username or password, avoid scams and more.





Set up your TWC Mail account





























Manage Accounts
Learn how to create subusers, check your mailbox size, adjust your mailbox size, allow and block messages and more.





Take control of your account





























Resources












Access TWC Mail








What are my incoming and outgoing mail server addresses?















Reset Password








How do I set up additional TWC Mail accounts?


























Email Setup





TWC MAIL SETTINGS 











Access your TWC Mail from any device by going to mail.twc.com or set up your TWC Mail using an email client, such as Outlook. You will need your TWC Mail username and password to sign in.











TWC Mail setup and help







Incoming and outgoing server information







Mobile device setup







Email client setup
















USERNAME AND PASSWORD 











We all have too many passwords and forget them sometimes. Retrieving a lost password or changing it is just a click away.











Retrieve your email username








Retrieve your email password



















RESOURCES





Using TWC Mail







Avoiding email scams and reporting abuse







View TWC Mail FAQs
















Manage Accounts





TWC SUBSCRIBER SELF CARE











Manage your TWC Mail accounts with TWC Subscriber Self Care. Some features such as adding a new sub user or allocating mailbox size are available only with the Master Account.
Access Subscriber Self Care to:

Create a new sub user
Check your mailbox sizes
Set your mailbox sizes
Allow and block messages












Managing TWC Mail







Access Subscriber Self Care



















RESOURCES





How do I set up additional TWC Mail Accounts?







How do I retrieve my email Master Account username?







Are there any email restrictions?







View TWC Mail FAQs




















































 













Community Forums

















Go to support overview

















Find a location near you

















Contact us















































Find Spectrum Stores | Spectrum Support
























































Skip To Content












































































TWC Stores

























Enter your full address







We’re sorry, but we do not have a store near that location.
To find a store or payment partner near you, try these tips:

- Change the ZIP Code
- Adjust the distance
- Alter your "Location Types" filter

Error: Please select at least one filter

Search by street address for more accurate results.







Within:

25 miles
50 miles
75 miles


























Location Types



 Full Service 



 Payment Partners 



 Sales Only Kiosk 








Clear



GO

























List
Map










Currently showing ({resultCount}) results near {formattedAddress}

















Email





Send to a Friend



Your Email Address





Send To





Add Comments (optional)












Send


Cancel


























 Full Service
                                

 Payment Partners
                                

 Sales Only Kiosk
                                

 New Store
                                








 Cash
                                

 Check
                                

 Credit Card
                                









NOTE: Full-service locations accept cash, check, credit card payments and provide equipment demos, exchanges, returns and self-installation kits. Payment Partners are third-party locations that only accept payments.


















{displayName}

                        {location.addressLine1}
                        {location.addressLine2}
                        
                        {location.city}, {location.state} {location.zip}
                    

Hours

                    {hours}
                    
Directions | Distance: {@math key=distance method="round"/} mi
                




                    {#listItems.paymentTypeList}
                        
                    {/listItems.paymentTypeList}
                    {#listItems.servicesList}
                        
                    {/listItems.servicesList}

                    {#listItems.locationTypeList}
                        
                    {/listItems.locationTypeList}

                    
Location Options
                    {#listItems.servicesList}
                        {niceName}
                    {/listItems.servicesList}
                








{displayName}

    {location.addressLine1}
    {location.addressLine2}
    
    {location.city}, {location.state} {location.zip}


Hours

{hours}

Directions | Distance: {@math key=distance method="round"/} mi







Verify your TWC Service ZIP Code to help us serve you better.







You are visiting us from an area we don’t currently service. Please enter your TWC Service ZIP Code.










GO







We could not determine your locationOur services may not be available in your area.

Make sure you entered your zip code correctly. If you entered your zip code correctly, visit cablemovers.com to contact the cable company serving your area.


Invalid Zip code format.Please enter valid Zip Code.


Cookies are not enabledYou do not have cookies enabled.In order for us to serve you better, please enable cookies.





























Community Forums

















Go to support overview

















Find a location near you

















Contact us















































Digital Adapters | Spectrum
























































Skip To Content

















































































Digital Adapters





















                    Ask TWC - Virtual Assistant
                







 Go



















Find the answers to questions our customers ask most often, such as:








Can I purchase my own internet modem?








How do I get a new remote control?








How do I make a payment?








What if I have problems logging in?








Where can I replace or return my TWC Internet hardware?
























What is a Digital Adapter?





A Digital Adapter is a small converter that allows viewing of digital TV services on your television. An adapter is about the size of a deck of cards.
If you connect your TV set directly from the wall with a cable wire, you will need equipment, such as a Digital Adapter, for every TV in your home.
Digital Adapters are no longer available.  Customers who have them can contact us with questions.





 






Details for Business Class customers






Para información en español





 
























 






Installing, Activating & Troubleshooting Your Digital Adapter

















Watch a video about how to install your Digital Adapter








 

















Watch a video about the digital conversion








 









 

Setup Guides & Remote Control Info





Adobe Reader required. Download here.
 








Cisco 271








Cisco 271 en Español













Cisco 170








Cisco 170 en Español













ARRIS/Motorola or Technicolor (English and Español)













 

Other Resources
Instructions: How to install, activate and troubleshoot your Digital Adapter
 








FAQs about digital conversion







FAQs about TV service encryption







(NYC, LA and Austin only)














 
Note: In addition to a Set-Top Box or a Digital Adapter, an HDTV or HD monitor is required to view high-definition TV programming.





 

















Community Forums

















Go to support overview

















Find a location near you

















Contact us





















 
*Digital Adapter is a device that provides digital-quality signals. It does not provide access to our on-screen channel guide, premium channels (such as HBO®, Showtime®, Starz®, etc.), Pay-Per-View or On Demand programming as well as video features such as Start Over® or Caller ID on TV. If you are interested in these digital services, you will need to lease a Digital Set-Top Box. Some services are not available to CableCARD™ customers or customers with Digital Adapters. As a condition of service, you may be required to have equipment for every TV in your home. Not all equipment supports all services. All services may not be available in all areas. Subject to change without notice.





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









